Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.036

Reports—Electronic format—Online access.

(1)(a) All reports required to be submitted to the legislature shall be provided only in an electronic format. Reports must be submitted electronically to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate. The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate shall provide an online site for reports submitted to the legislature on the legislative internet home page. The reports shall be organized in such a way as to make the reports easy to find and accessible by legislators, staff, and the public.

(b) Upon electronic submittal of the required report to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate, the agency shall send a letter, also by electronic means, to the appropriate legislative committee that the report has been filed. The letter may include a brief summary of the report. The public entity submitting the report may make hard copies available by request.

(2)(a) All annual and biennial reports to the governor shall be provided only in an electronic format. The reports shall be organized in such a way as to make the reports easy to find and accessible by the public.

(b) Upon electronic submittal of the required report to the governor's office, the agency shall send a letter, also by electronic means, that the report has been filed. The letter may include a brief summary of the report. The entity submitting the report may make hard copies available by request.

[ 2009 c 518 s 24.]